Washington statutes.
RCW 19.305.090

Exemptions.

This chapter does not prohibit any person or entity from manufacturing or selling cigarettes that do not meet the requirements of RCW 19.305.020 if the cigarettes are or will be stamped for sale in another state or are packaged for sale outside the United States and that person or entity has taken reasonable steps to ensure that the cigarettes will not be sold or offered for sale to persons located in this state.

[ 2008 c 239 s 10.]